Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1,107
Violations; department; Attorney General; powers and duties; applicability of section.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the department shall provide the Attorney General with a copy of all complaints it receives and advise the Attorney General of investigations it makes which may involve any possible violation of statutes or rules and regulations by a credential holder. The Attorney General shall then determine which, if any, statutes, rules, or regulations the credential holder has violated and the appropriate legal action to take. The Attorney General may (a) elect to file a petition under section 38-186 or not to file a petition, (b) negotiate a voluntary surrender or voluntary limitation pursuant to section 38-1,109, or (c) in cases involving a minor or insubstantial violation, refer the matter to the appropriate board for the opportunity to resolve the matter by recommending to the Attorney General that he or she enter into an assurance of compliance with the credential holder in lieu of filing a petition. An assurance of compliance shall not constitute discipline against a credential holder.

(2) This section does not apply to the following professions or businesses: Asbestos abatement, inspection, project design, and training; lead-based paint abatement, inspection, project design, and training; medical radiography; and radon detection, measurement, and mitigation.

Laws 1984, LB 481, § 2;

Laws 1986, LB 286, § 76;

Laws 1986, LB 579, § 68;

Laws 1991, LB 456, § 25;

Laws 1994, LB 1210, § 52;

Laws 1999, LB 828, § 58;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-171.01;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 107;

Laws 2021, LB148, § 50.